District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3113

Maximum charge.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 4, 1978, D.C. Law 2-114, § 14, 25 DCR 1985
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 25(b), 45 DCR 1782
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 28, 47 DCR 3431

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3113.
1973 Ed., § 47-3213.